Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-155.01
Interpreter; oath required.

In any proceeding in which a deaf or hard of hearing person is testifying under oath or affirmation, the interpreter shall take an oath or affirmation that he or she will make a true interpretation of the proceeding in an understandable manner to the best of his or her ability.

Laws 1987, LB 376, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 20-157;

Laws 1997, LB 851, § 7.